tests/morphophonology/pending/diyerge.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] some у verb forms": 
    ди<v><tv><gna_perf> : дип
    ди<v><tv><prc_perf> : дип
    ди<v><tv><pass><gpr_past> : диелгән
    ди<v><tv><inf> : дияргә
    ди<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : ди
    ди<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : диң
    ди<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : димә
    ди<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : дисез
